Hawaii statutes.
[§105-11] State motor pool revolving fund.
(a) There shall be in the state treasury, a state motor pool revolving fund
for acquisition, operation, repair, maintenance, storage, and disposal of
state-owned vehicles assigned to the motor pool.

(b) All proceeds collected from motor pool
rentals shall be deposited in the state motor pool revolving fund and be
expended by the comptroller to carry out the purposes of this section. [L 1986,
c 68, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next